Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4058.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 418.321 or 418.322, if there is reason to know, as
described in ORS 419B.636, that a child is an Indian child, the Department of Human Services
may place the child in an out-of-state institution meeting the criteria described in ORS
419B.654 (1)(d)(B)(iv) without requiring the institution to be licensed by or under contract
with the department or to be a qualified residential treatment program if:
(a) The placement complies with the placement preferences under ORS 419B.654; and
(b) The department provides at least 10 days’ notice to the court and the parties of the
proposed placement or, if the delay caused by providing this notice would likely result in
serious physical or emotional harm to the child, endanger the child’s life or cause loss of
placement availability, the department shall provide the notice to the court and the parties
as soon as practicable and in no event later than one business day after the child leaves this
state.
(2) ORS 418.321 (1) to (4) or (6) does not apply to the department’s placement of a child
in an out-of-state child-caring agency if:
(a) The placement is for the purpose of placing the child or ward in a relative foster home
or preadoptive family placement that has been selected and approved by the department;
(b) The department retains the sole authority to approve the foster care or preadoptive
placement of the child;
(c) The child is not placed in a congregate care residential setting, as defined in ORS
418.322; and
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 236

A-Eng. HB 4058
(d) The placement complies with the requirements of the Interstate Compact on the
Placement of Children.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(b) “Indian child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.603.
(c) “Out-of-state child-caring agency” means a provider of children’s care or services in
a state other than Oregon that would be required to be licensed, certified or otherwise au-
thorized by the department under ORS 418.240 if the provider provided the care or services
in this state.
(d) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described in ORS 418.323.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]